California statutes. Education Code
(3) (A) Having complied with paragraphs (1) and (2), conduct an election by secret ballot of its classified personnel to determine whether or not they desire to make the merit system applicable to the school district. The ballot shall read:“Shall the merit (civil service) system for classified employees be applicable in the ____________ (name of school district)?☐ Yes☐ No”(B) Although the ballot shall not require the employees’ signatures or other personal identifying requirements, the governing board of the school district shall devise an identification system to ensure against fraud in the balloting process while also ensuring ballot secrecy.

(c) (1) The governing board of the school district shall appoint a three- or five-person tabulation committee, at least one member of which shall be a member of the governing board of the school district and at least one member of which shall be a classified employee designated by the largest exclusive representative of classified employees within the school district, to canvass the ballots and present the results to the governing board of the school district. No representative of the school district shall make any marks upon the ballot envelope or ballot of any employee, except that the
 tabulation committee may adopt a system of uniformly stamping in a consistent manner and in the same location on all ballots received or all ballots counted, or both of those, to help ensure an accurate count. If a simple majority votes in favor of the merit system, that system shall become applicable in the school district.

(2) The tabulation committee shall certify the results of the election to the governing board of the school district at the next regular or special meeting of the governing board of the school district following the date the committee completes tabulation of the votes. If the tabulation committee completes the tabulation on the same day that the governing board of the school district meets in regular or special session, the committee shall certify the results of the election to the governing board of the school district at that meeting.

(d) If the school
 district communicates with classified employees in opposition to adopting the merit (civil service) system, it shall provide at least equal time and equal access to any exclusive representative of classified employees within the school district to communicate in favor of that system. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as limiting the rights of an exclusive representative under the Educational Employment Relations Act (Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code) for access to communicate its position on adopting the system.

(e) All election procedures not specified above for an election pursuant to this section shall be within the scope of representation of an exclusive representative under Section 3543.2 of the Government Code, including the rules for campaigning, the election date, time, and place, translation of the ballot, electioneering near the polls, and balloting
 methods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 88, Sec. 1.   (AB 289)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

45222.

Effective upon certification to a governing board by a tabulating committee that an election, as authorized in Section 45221 of this code, has been successful, all of the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter that can reasonably be construed to be applicable to classified employees shall be applicable.

All of the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter shall become fully effective upon appointment of at least two members of the personnel commission.

The commission shall immediately adopt existing rules and regulations of the
 district relating to classified personnel pending the establishment of its rules and which are not inconsistent with law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45223.

The governing board of a school district whose average daily attendance is less than 3,000 may, by affirmative vote of a majority of its members, adopt the procedure set forth in Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter. The motion or a resolution for adoption of the system shall specify the date that the provisions of Article 6 shall be applicable to the classified employees of the district, which shall not be later than July 1 next following the date of adoption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45224.

The governing board of a school district whose average daily attendance is 3,000 or more may, by affirmative vote of a majority of its members, and a county superintendent of schools, with the consent of the majority of the members of the county board of education, adopt the procedure set forth in Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter, provided a lawful petition has not been received as authorized in Section 45221, or may adopt the procedure at any time after a two-year period has elapsed following an unsuccessful election conducted in accordance with Section 45221 of this code.

The motion, order, or resolution
 for adoption of the procedure shall specify the date that the provisions of Article 6 shall be applicable to classified employees, which shall not be later than July 1 next following the date of adoption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45224.5.

The procedure set forth in Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter may also be adopted by a majority of the voting electors of the school districts assenting to the plan after it has been placed on the ballot upon the written petition of qualified electors not less in number than 10 percent of the number voting in the last election for a member of the governing board. The question of adoption shall be placed on the ballot at the next regular governing board member election, or the next primary or general election in a general election year, whichever is earlier after receipt of the petition by the registrar of voters.

The ballot measure shall specify the date that the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter shall be applicable to classified employees, which shall not be later than July 1 next following the date of adoption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45225.

When an election has been held, as authorized in this article, and fails to receive a simple majority affirmative vote, the classified employees of that district may not again petition for an election until at least two years has elapsed since the last election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45226.

Any person who intimidates, coerces, or discriminates in any way against any classified employee for the doing of any act authorized herein shall be personally liable to such employee for all damages suffered thereby and such exemplary damages as the court may allow.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45227.

(a) Positions established by a county superintendent of schools, while serving as the administrative agent for the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team established pursuant to Section 42127.8, to carry out the purposes of Section 42127.8 and Article 6 (commencing with Section 49080) of Chapter 6.5 of Part 27 of Division 4, including positions associated with the California School Information Services, shall be exempt from the merit system, including, but not limited to, the requirements of Sections 45261 and 45272.

(b) Employees exempted from the merit system under subdivision (a) shall remain a part of the classified service and shall be afforded
 all statutory rights, benefits, and burdens of other classified employees employed by nonmerit system school districts or county superintendents of schools, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 39.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Merit System [45240. - 45320.]

45240.

A school district that adopts the provisions of this article in accordance with Section 45222 or 45224.5 shall appoint a personnel commission in the manner prescribed in Sections 45245, 45246 and 45247. The personnel commission shall appoint a director in the manner provided in Section 45264 after appointment of at least two members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 547, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

45241.

In any district in which the procedure set forth in this article has been incorporated the governing board shall employ, pay, and otherwise control the services of persons in positions not requiring certification qualifications only in accordance with the provisions of this article.

No governing board shall remove a position from the classified service by title assignment or otherwise which would then require an incumbent to be credentialed if such position is not required by this code to be designated as certificated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45243.

In any district that has adopted this article there shall be appointed a personnel commission composed of three members. If two or more districts are under the jurisdiction of governing boards of identical personnel, only one commission shall be appointed. In those cases this article shall apply alike to all of the districts, and the expenses of the commission shall be paid out of the general funds of all of the districts in proportion to the benefits derived therefrom as determined by the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1, Sec. 3.   Effective February 22, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

45243.5.

Notwithstanding Section 45243, in the case of a unified district and a community college district which are under the jurisdiction of governing boards of identical personnel and which had a majority of their population within an incorporated city which had a population between 70,000 and 75,000 as of the 1950 census, the governing board may, by affirmative vote of the majority of its members, elect to make the provisions of this article applicable to each of the districts individually and separately. In such cases, the expenses of the commission shall be paid out of general funds of the districts in proportion to the benefits derived therefrom as determined by the governing board.

In the case of action by the governing board to make the provisions of this article applicable to each of the districts individually and separately, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the rights of persons employed in positions not requiring certification qualifications shall continue in the same manner as if such separation had not occurred, except that such rights shall be limited to the district in which the person is employed on the day such action is taken by the governing board. For purposes of determining seniority, employment shall be deemed to have commenced as of the date of original employment in either the unified district or the community college district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 101, Sec. 1.   Effective May 16, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

45244.

(a) To be eligible for appointment or reappointment to the commission a person shall meet both of the following requirements:

(1) Be a registered voter and resident within the territorial jurisdiction of the school district.

(2) Be a known adherent to the principle of the merit system. No member of the governing board of any school district or a county board of education shall be eligible for appointment, reappointment, or continuance as a member of the commission. During his or her term of service, a member of the commission shall not be an employee of the school district.

(b) As used in this section, residence is that place in which his or her habitation is fixed, wherein the person has the intention of remaining, and to which, whenever he or she is absent, the person has the intention of returning. At a given time, a person may have only one residence.

(c) As used in this section, “known adherent to the principle of the merit system,” with respect to a new appointee, means a person who by the nature of his or her prior public or private service has given evidence that he or she supports the concept of employment, continuance in employment, in-service promotional opportunities, and other related matters on the basis of merit and fitness. As used in this section, “known adherent to the principle of the merit system,” with respect to a candidate for reappointment, means a commissioner who has clearly demonstrated through meeting attendance and actions that he or she does, in fact, support the merit system and its operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1, Sec. 4.   Effective February 22, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

45245.

One member of the personnel commission shall be appointed by the governing board of the district and one member, nominated by the classified employees of the district, shall be appointed by the governing board of the district. Those two members shall, in turn, appoint the third member.

As used in this section, “classified employees” shall mean an exclusive representative which represents the largest number of noncertificated employees in a unit or units within the district. If there is no exclusive representative within the district, the governing board shall, by written rule, prescribe the method by which the recommendation is to be made by its classified employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective February 22, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

45246.

(a) Within 30 days after adoption of the system, the governing board shall publicly announce its intended appointee or appointees, as appropriate, and the appointee or appointees, as appropriate, nominated by its classified employees. As soon after their appointment as practicable but within 30 days, the appointed members shall announce their intended appointee for the third member. They may consider the recommendations of the governing board, the classified employees, or other concerned citizens. If these members do not announce their intended appointee within the 30-day period, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall make the appointment.

“Adoption of the system” means, in the case of Section 45221, the day on which a successful election is certified to the governing board or, in the case of Section 45224, the day the governing board approves a motion, order, or resolution to adopt the system regardless of the date specified for operational commencement of the system.

(b) Where a system is already in existence and a vacancy will exist on December 1, by not later than September 30:

(1) The governing board shall publicly announce the name of the person it intends to appoint or reappoint, if the vacancy is its appointee.

(2) The appointee of the governing board and the appointee or appointees of the classified employees shall publicly announce the name of the person they intend to appoint, if the vacancy is their appointee.

If the governing board and the classified employees of the district are unable to agree upon a nomination by September 30, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall make the appointment within 30 days.

(c) Where a system is already in existence and a vacancy in a position nominated by the classified employees will occur, the classified employees shall submit the name of its nominee to the governing board at least 30 days before the date on which the vacancy will occur and the governing board shall appoint that nominee to be effective on the date on which the vacancy would occur.

(d) At a board meeting to be held after 30 and within 45 days of the dates specified in subdivision (a) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), as the case may be, the governing board in open hearing shall provide the public and employees and employee organizations the opportunity to express their views on the qualifications of those persons recommended by the governing board for appointment.

The board at the time may make its appointment or may make a substitute appointment or recommendation without further notification or public hearing.

In the case of the nominees of the classified employees, the board shall appoint the nominee, unless the classified employees voluntarily withdraw the name of the nominee and submit the name of a new nominee. In the latter case, the board then shall appoint the new nominee.

(e) If a vacancy exists because of a failure of the classified employees to agree on a nominee, the board may make an emergency appointment as authorized in subdivision (b) of Section 45248. If there is no personnel director, the board nevertheless may make an emergency interim appointment under this subdivision.

(f) At the next regularly scheduled personnel commission meeting to be held after 30 days from adoption of the system, as specified in subdivision (a), or at the next regularly scheduled personnel commission meeting to be held after 30 days from the day the intended appointee is announced, as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), as the case may be, the appointee of the governing board and the appointee nominated by the classified employees shall, in an open hearing, provide the public and employees and employee organizations the opportunity to express their views on the qualifications of each candidate recommended for the vacancy. Each candidate shall be invited to this meeting.

The appointee of the governing board and the appointee nominated by the classified employees may make their appointment or may make a substitute appointment or recommendation without further notification or public hearing.

(g) A commissioner whose term has expired may continue to discharge the duties of the office until a successor is appointed, but for no more than 90 calendar days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1, Sec. 6.   Effective February 22, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

45247.

Appointees to a commission in a district which has newly adopted the system shall take office upon receipt of notification of appointment but the term of office shall run from noon of the first day of December next succeeding.

In school districts with a three-member personnel commission, the initial appointee of the governing board shall serve a three-year term, and the term of the appointee recommended by classified employees, and the third member selected by the two other members shall be for two years and one year respectively.

In school districts which have elected to establish a five-member personnel commission, one of the initial appointees of the governing board, and one of the initial appointees nominated by the classified employees shall serve three-year terms. The term of the other initial appointee of the governing board, and the other initial appointee nominated by the classified employees of the district, shall be for two years, and the term of the appointee selected by the other members of the commission shall be for one year.

Subsequent terms shall be for three years commencing at noon the first day of December.

A three-member commission may perform any act authorized or required by law when two members have been appointed.

A five-member commission may perform any act authorized or required by law when three members have been appointed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 723, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

45248.

(a) Appointment to vacancies occurring subsequent to the initial appointment shall be made by the original appointing authority either for a new full term or to fill an unexpired term. The procedures required in Sections 45245 and 45246 shall be followed in the appointment and recommendation for appointment to fill vacancies occurring subsequent to the initial appointments.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) the governing board at the request of the personnel director shall declare that an emergency exists and shall make an interim appointment to fill a vacancy or vacancies to insure the continuance of the functions of the personnel commission. An interim appointment shall terminate on the date the notification of permanent appointment is received by the appointee.

(c) An interim appointee must meet the requirements of Section 45244 and be free of the restrictions contained therein.

(d) An interim appointment in no event shall be valid for more than 60 days.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45249.

(a) (1) After January 1, 2001, the classified employees of any school district that has already adopted this article on September 17, 1965, may, in accordance with this article, petition the governing board to request that the process to determine how personnel commission members are appointed be determined by a majority vote of the classified employees entitled to vote. That petition shall read substantially as follows:

“We, the undersigned classified employees of the ____________ (name of school district), constituting 15 percent or more of the classified personnel entitled to vote, request the governing board to submit to an election the question of how personnel commission members shall be appointed.
NAME ____ POSITION CLASSIFICATION _____________”

(2) “Classified employee,” as used in this section, shall be construed to include all personnel who are a part of the classified service as defined in Section 45103.

(b) (1) Within 90 days after receipt of a petition pursuant to subdivision (a), the governing board shall conduct an election by secret ballot of its classified personnel to determine the following question and the ballot shall read:

“Shall personnel commission members in the ____________ (name of school district) be appointed as follows:

(A) One member appointed by the governing board of the district.

(B) One member appointed by the classified employees of the district.

(C) Those two members shall, in turn, appoint the third member.
____ Yes
____ No”

(2) Although the ballot conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not require the employees’ signatures or other personal identifying requirements, the governing board shall devise an identification system to ensure against fraud in the balloting process.

(3) The governing board shall appoint a three- to five-person tabulating committee. At least one member of the committee shall be a member of the governing board, to canvass the ballots and present the results to the governing board and one member shall be a classified employee nominated by the exclusive representative of the classified employees of the district. If a simple majority votes in favor of the process for appointing personnel commission members, that process shall become applicable in the district as follows:

(A) The first vacancy on the commission shall be filled by a person nominated by the classified employees of the district.

(B) The second vacancy on the commission shall be filled by a person appointed by the governing board of the district.

(C) The third vacancy of the commission shall be appointed by the first two members.

(4) If the ballot conducted pursuant to paragraph (2) fails to pass, personnel commission members shall be appointed in accordance with the procedure described in subdivision (c), and a petition by the classified employees for another election shall not occur sooner than two years after an election.

(c) (1) Subject to subdivisions (a) and (b), in a school district that has already adopted this article on September 17, 1965, members of the personnel commission shall be appointed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction who shall consider the recommendation of the governing board and other interested parties. Subsequent appointments shall be made in accordance with this section.

(2) No later than 90 days before making the appointment, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall notify the classified employees and the governing board, in writing, of the vacancy on the personnel commission and provide them with guidelines and procedures for making a recommendation and challenging a nomination. If a vacancy occurs during the term of a member of the personnel commission, the superintendent may appoint a new member after providing the foregoing notice no later than 30 days before making the appointment.

A commissioner whose term has expired may continue to discharge the duties of the office until a successor is appointed but for no more than 90 calendar days.

(d) As used in this section, “classified employees” means an organization of classified employees that represents the greatest number of classified employees of the district as determined by the board. If no organization exists within the district, the governing board, by written rule, shall prescribe the method by which the recommendation is to be made by its classified employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 488, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

45250.

The governing board may authorize payment to members of the commission an amount not to exceed fifty dollars ($50) per meeting and not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 723, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

45251.

In a unified school district with an average daily attendance in excess of 250,000, the governing board may authorize payment to members of the commission an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per meeting, and not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 920, Sec. 10.   (SB 913)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

45252.

The governing board shall provide the commission with suitable office accommodations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45253.

(a) The commission shall prepare an annual budget for its own office which, upon the approval of the county superintendent of schools, shall be included by the governing board in the regular budget of the school district. The annual budget of the commission may include amounts for the purposes of Section 45255.

(b) The budget shall be prepared for a public hearing by the commission to be held not later than May 30 of each year, or at a date agreed upon between the governing board and the personnel commission to coincide with the process of adoption of the school district budget. The commission shall forward a copy of its proposed budget to the governing board indicating the time, date and place for the public hearing of the budget and shall invite board and district administration representatives to attend and present their views. The commission shall fully consider the views of the governing board prior to adoption of its proposed budget. The commission shall then forward its proposed budget to the county superintendent of schools for action.

(c) If the county superintendent of schools proposes to reject the budget as submitted by the commission of a school district, he or she shall, within 30 days after the commission’s submission of the budget, hold a public hearing on the proposed rejection within the affected district. He or she shall have informed both the commission and the governing board of the date, time and place of the hearing. He or she may after the public hearing either reject, or, with the concurrence of the commission, amend the proposed budget. In the absence of agreement between the personnel commission and the county superintendent, the budget of the preceding year shall determine the amount of the new budget, and the items of expenditure shall be determined by the commission.

(d) If the county superintendent of schools proposes to reject the budget as submitted by the personnel commission of a county office of education, the county superintendent shall contract with the Office of Administrative Hearings of the State of California for an administrative law judge to conduct a public hearing on the proposed rejection. The administrative law judge shall render findings and any proposed amendments, if any, to the proposed budget. The personnel commission may accept or reject the findings and proposed amendments. If the personnel commission rejects the findings and proposed amendments, if any, of the administrative law judge, the budget of the preceding year shall determine the amount of the new budget, and the items of expenditure shall be determined by the commission.

(e) The procedures of subdivision (d) apply if an individual serves as both the county superintendent of schools and the superintendent of a school district within the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 652, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

45254.

The budget for the first year of the personnel commission of the school district shall be determined by the personnel commission, in conjunction with the governing board of the school district. In the absence of an agreement between the personnel commission and the governing board, the commission shall forward its proposed budget to the county superintendent of schools, who shall determine the budget based upon the average of personnel commission budgets of the same type of school districts that have comparable enrollment within the county. In the absence of comparable school districts within the county, comparable statewide averages shall be used. The governing board shall provide funds to support the work of the personnel commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 368, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

45255.

The commission may, with respect to the staff of the commission, expend funds for their orientation, training, retraining, and development and for any purpose prescribed by Article 9 (commencing with Section 45380) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45256.

(a) The commission shall classify all employees and positions within the jurisdiction of the governing board of the school district or of the commission, except those that are exempt from the classified service, as specified in subdivision (b). The employees and positions shall be known as the classified service. “To classify” shall include, but not be limited to, allocating positions to appropriate classes, arranging classes into occupational hierarchies, determining reasonable relationships within occupational hierarchies, and preparing written class specifications.

(b) All of the following are exempt from the classified service:

(1) Positions that require certification qualifications.

(2) Full-time students employed part time.

(3) Part-time students employed part time in a college work-study program, or in a work experience education program conducted by a community college district pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 51760) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 of Division 4 and that is financed by state or federal funds.

(4) Apprentice positions.

(5) Positions established for the employment of professional experts on a temporary basis for a specific project by the governing board of the school district or by the commission when so designated
 by the commission.

(c) (1) Employment of either full-time or part-time students in a college work-study program, or in a work experience education program shall not result in the displacement of classified personnel or impair existing contracts for services.

(2) Nothing in this section shall prevent an employee, who has attained regular status in a full-time position, from taking a voluntary reduction in time and retaining his or her regular status under the provisions of this law.

(d) A person whose contribution consists solely in the rendition of individual personal services and whose employment does not come within the scope of the exceptions listed above shall not be employed outside the
 classified service.

(e) A part-time position is one for which the assigned time, when computed on an hourly, daily, weekly, or monthly basis, is less than 8712 percent of the normally assigned time of the majority of employees in the classified service.

(f) An employee employed by a school district in a part-time playground position as of the effective date of the laws placing part-time playground positions into the classified service shall be deemed a permanent employee of the school district without placement on an eligibility list under Section 45272 or examination under Section 45273.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 488, Sec. 1.   (AB 2160)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

45256.5.

(a) The governing board of a school district may adopt a resolution designating certain positions as senior management of the classified service. Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the decision of the governing board shall not be deemed a matter subject to negotiation, but shall be subject to review by the Public Employment Relations Board.

(b) Employees whose positions are designated as senior management of the classified service shall be a part of the classified service and shall be afforded all rights, benefits, and burdens of other classified employees, except that they shall be exempt from all provisions relating to obtaining permanent status in a senior management position.

(c) Positions in the senior management of the classified service shall be filled from an unranked list of eligible persons who have demonstrated managerial ability who have been found qualified for the positions as specified by the district superintendent and determined by the personnel commission.

(d) Notice of reassignment or dismissal from a position in the senior management of the classified service shall be provided in accordance with the provisions of Section 35031.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1302, Sec. 16.5.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

45258.

Positions established for the employment of community representatives in advisory or consulting capacities shall be considered part of the classified service.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 297, Sec. 2.   (AB 2261)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

45259.

If the governing board of any school district establishes positions and restricts initial appointment of new employees to mentally, physically, or developmentally disabled persons, then such positions shall, in addition to the regular class title, be classified as “restricted.” The positions shall be part of the classified service and persons so employed shall be classified employees for all purposes except they shall not be subject to the provisions of Section 45272 or 45273, and that they shall not acquire permanent status or seniority credit and shall not be eligible for promotion into the regular classified service until they have complied with the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 45105.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

45260.

(a) The commission shall prescribe, amend, and interpret, subject to this article, such rules as may be necessary to insure the efficiency of the service and the selection and retention of employees upon a basis of merit and fitness. The rules shall not apply to bargaining unit members if the subject matter is within the scope of representation, as defined in Section 3543.2 of the Government Code, and is included in a negotiated agreement between the governing board and that unit. The rules shall be binding upon the governing board, but shall not restrict the authority of the governing board provided pursuant to other sections of this code.

(b) No rule or amendment which would affect classified employees who are represented by a certified or recognized exclusive bargaining representative shall be adopted by the commission until the exclusive bargaining representative and the public school employer of the classified employees who would be affected have been given reasonable notice of the proposal.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1514, Sec. 1) by Stats. 1984, Ch. 521, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

45261.

(a) The rules shall provide for the procedures to be followed by the governing board as they pertain to the classified service regarding applications, examinations, eligibility, appointments, promotions, demotions, transfers, dismissals, resignations, layoffs, reemployment, vacations, leaves of absence, compensation within classification, job analyses and specifications, performance evaluations, public advertisement of examinations, rejection of unfit applicants without competition, and any other matters necessary to carry out the provisions and purposes of this article.

(b) With respect to those matters set forth in subdivision (a) which are a subject of negotiation under the provisions of Section 3543.2 of the Government Code, such rules as apply to each bargaining unit shall be in accordance with the negotiated agreement, if any, between the exclusive representative for that unit and the public school employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1014.)
-------------------------------------------

45262.

(a) The rules of the commission and copies of this article shall be printed and made available or electronically transmitted to each school, office, and permanent worksite where employees report, and shall be distributed to school libraries for loan to employees.

(b) Within one year of the adoption of the merit system, the commission shall adopt rules pursuant to Section 45260 and shall give to each new regular employee a handbook that summarizes the basic rules and working conditions for classified employees and provides information regarding access to copies of the complete rules and the merit system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 547, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

45263.

The commission may classify as apprentice positions certain positions where the principal requirement is that of learning to perform efficiently, by study and practice, specific duties concerning which a definite plan of systematic instruction and special supervision has been approved by the California Apprenticeship Council for a designated trade in the building and construction trades and for firefighters or by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations for other designated trades.

The apprenticeship training plan adopted by the governing board of the school district must be approved by the California Apprenticeship Council for building and construction trades and for firefighters or by the Chief of the Division of
 Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations for other trades.
